Washington statutes.
RCW 10.58.040

Intent to defraud.

Whenever an intent to defraud shall be made an element of an offense, it shall be sufficient if an intent appears to defraud any person, association or body politic or corporate whatsoever.

[ 1909 c 249 s 40; RRS s 2292.]